Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.010

Purpose.

The purposes of a television reception improvement district, hereinafter referred to in this chapter as "district", shall be to serve the public interest, convenience, and necessity in the construction, maintenance, and operation of television and FM radio translator stations, including appropriate electric or electronic devices for increasing television program distribution, but said purposes are not meant to include the construction or operation of television cable systems, commonly known and referred to as cable TV systems or CATV.

[ 1985 c 76 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 1.]